Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 1 Wyoming Election Code

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d Elections § 1 et seq.

29 C.J.S. Elections § 1 et seq.

§ 22-1-101.
Citation.

This act is cited as
the Wyoming Election Code of 1973, as amended.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to bond elections see §§

22-21-101

to

22-21-112

.

As to school elections, see §§

22-22-101

to

22-22-304

.

As to municipal elections, see §§

22-23-101

to

22-23-1007

.

As to offenses and penalties in connection with elections, see §§

22-26-101

to

22-26-121

.

As to suffrage and elections generally, see art. 6, §§ 1 to 22, Wyoming Const.

As to election of legislators, see art. 3, § 5, Wyoming Const.

For provisions requiring special election in cities and towns on question of acquisition of public utility plants, etc., by condemnation, etc., see §

1-26-808

.

As to liability of radio and television stations for libel and slander in regard to statements made by political candidates, see §

1-29-102

.

As to election of coroner, see §

7-4-101

.

As to election on formation of conservation districts, see §

11-16-110

.

As to special election with reference to formation of new county, see §

18-1-306

et seq.

As to election for establishment of county building fund, see §

18-4-201

.

As to election with reference to county viaduct and subway bonds, see §

18-4-503

et seq.

As to election for establishment of county zoning district, see § 18-5-104.

As to elections in cities and towns with reference to relocation of state highways, see §

24-7-101

.

As to election on question of establishment of hospital district, see §

35-2-401

.

As to procedure for initial election of trustees of hospital districts, see §

35-2-404

.

As to election of trustees after organization of sanitary and improvement district, see §

35-3-103

.

As to election in connection with establishment of special cemetery districts, see §

35-8-301

.

As to election of trustees of special cemetery districts, see §

35-8-304

et seq.

For duty of county commissioners to hold election of board of directors or fire protection districts, see §

35-9-202

.

As to election of commissioners of power districts, see §§

37-7-134

to

37-7-136

.

As to election of board of directors of water conservancy districts, see §

41-3-740

.

As to election prior to issuance of bonds of water conservancy districts, see §

41-3-754

et seq.

As to election in connection with the establishment of flood control districts, see §

41-3-801

.

As to election of board of directors of flood control districts, see §

41-3-802

.

As to election of district advisory board in underground water districts declared to be critical area, see §

41-3-913

.

As to election in connection with joint operations between irrigation and drainage districts, see §

41-6-102

et seq.

As to election of irrigation district commissioners, see §§

41-7-316

to

41-7-318

.

As to election of board of directors of public irrigation and power districts, see §

41-7-805

et seq.

As to election to change public irrigation and power district to irrigation district, see §

41-7-832

.

As to election on dissolution of irrigation district, see §§

41-7-1002

,

41-7-1003

.

As to election of drainage district commissioners, see §

41-9-116

et seq.

As to election upon dissolution of drainage districts, §§

41-9-601

to

41-9-603

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Residence and Settlement Laws, Their Effect on Elections, Welfare and the Right of Free Movement,” see 12 Wyo. L.J. 50 (1957).

For article, "Wyoming Election Law: Proposals for Reform”,see 12 Wyo. L. Rev. 29 (2012).

§ 22-1-102.
Definitions.

The definitions contained in this chapter apply to words and phrases used in this Election Code and govern the construction of those words and phrases unless they are specifically modified by the context in which they appear. As used in this Election Code:

“Automatic tabulating equipment” means apparatus that automatically examines and counts votes recorded on paper ballots or ballot cards and tabulates the results;

“Ballot” means the cardboard, paper or other material upon which a voter marks his votes;

“Ballot card” means a ballot that can be counted using automatic tabulating equipment;

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 2.

“Ballot proposition” is any question or measure submitted to a vote of the people of the state, a subdivision thereof, county, district, city or town, and includes a constitutional amendment, initiative, referendum, bond measure, or any other question or measure required to be approved by a vote of the people;

“Bond” means any bond, note, certificate of indebtedness, coupon, or other obligation for the payment of money, issued by any political subdivision, including any bond payable from taxes, revenues or other sources;

“Candidate’s campaign committee” means every group of two (2) or more persons who join together for the purpose of raising, collecting or expending money to be used in the aid of the election of a specific candidate for public office. If more than one (1) committee forms to support the candidate, the candidate shall designate which committee shall be his or her principal campaign committee;

“Chief judge” means the person selected to be responsible for the security of ballot envelopes and voter ballots. The chief judge shall serve as the primary contact at the polls to the county clerk;

“City clerk” means a clerk of a municipality;

“Convention” is an organized assemblage of electors or delegates representing a political party;

“Counting center” is the location or locations designated by the county clerk for the automatic tabulating and counting of ballots;

“County chairman” means the county chairman of a political party or the state chairman if the party has no chairman for the particular county;

“Election,” when used without qualifying adjectives, means all elections participated in by the voters of a city, town, county, district or the state;

“Electronic voting system” is a system employing an electronic voting device in conjunction with paper ballots or ballot cards, or other system of secret voting and automatic tabulating equipment for the recording, tabulating and counting of votes in an election;

“Envelope” means any type of container used to contain or hold election documents;

“Independent candidate” is a person who is running for nomination or election to a public office but who does not represent a political party;

“Major political party” means a political organization whose candidate for any one (1) of the offices of the United States house of representatives, governor or secretary of state, received not less than ten percent (10%) of the total votes cast for that office in the most recent general election;

“Minor political party” means a political organization whose candidate for any one (1) of the offices of the United States house of representatives, governor or secretary of state, received not less than two percent (2%) nor more than ten percent (10%) of the total votes cast for that office in the most recent general election;

“Municipality” includes a first class city as defined by W.S. 15-1-101(a)(iv) and a town as defined by W.S. 15-1-101(a)(xiv);

“Political action committee” means any group of two (2) or more persons organized and associated for the purpose of raising, collecting or spending money for use in the aid of, or otherwise influencing or attempting to influence, directly or indirectly, the election or defeat of candidates for public office, candidate’s committees, or political parties, for support of or opposition to any initiative or referendum petition drive or for the adoption or defeat of any ballot proposition;

“Political subdivision” includes any county, city, town, school district, community college district, hospital district, water conservancy district, cemetery district, fire protection district, or any other political subdivision of the state constituting a body corporate, whether incorporated under general act, special charter, or otherwise;

“Pollbook” means a book, or hardware, software or any combination thereof commonly referred to as an electronic pollbook, used in a polling place on election day containing information specified by law;

“Poll list” is the list of registered voters as compiled by the clerk for use by election judges at the polls. The poll list shall:

Include the names and residence addresses of electors registered in the precinct;

Indicate the precinct and various districts in which each elector resides;

Indicate political party affiliation of the electors, if any;

Indicate which electors have registered by mail and must show identification;

Indicate which electors have submitted absentee ballots in the election prior to the printing of the poll list;

Provide for the notation of:

A sequential number for each elector voting at the polls;

Electors who cast provisional ballots;

Electors who cast absentee ballots if the absentee ballots are processed and counted at the polls;

Electors who change political party affiliation at the polls.

Provide for the recording of the same information for electors who register at the polls;

Provide other space as required for election management purposes.

“Poll watcher” means a person certified by the county chairman of a political party to observe voter turn out and registration. A “poll watcher” is not an election official;

“Provisional party” means a political organization which has filed a legally valid petition as provided under article 4 of chapter 4 of this code. The filing of a legally valid petition entitles the provisional party to participate in the next general election. If the provisional party’s candidate for any one (1) of the offices of the United States house of representatives, governor or secretary of state, receives not less than two percent (2%) of the total votes cast for that office in that election, the provisional party does not lose party status;

“Qualified elector” includes every citizen of the United States who is a bona fide resident of Wyoming, has registered to vote and will be at least eighteen (18) years of age on the day of the election at which he may offer to vote. No person is a qualified elector who is a currently adjudicated mentally incompetent person, or who has been convicted of a felony and his civil or voting rights have not been restored. A literacy test shall not be imposed as a condition to voting in any election;

“Registration” is the entry and verification of the name and voter information of a qualified elector on the official registry list, as provided in W.S. 22-3-104(f) and

22-3-108

;

“Registry agent” is a county clerk, his deputies, a tribal clerk, his deputies, a city clerk, his deputies, and an election judge during any election specified in W.S. 22-2-101(a)(i) through (viii);

“Registry list” is the list by precinct of the names, addresses, party affiliations and precinct and district numbers of the registered electors in the county prepared by the secretary of state or county clerks for distribution as provided in W.S.

22-2-113

;

“Residence” is the place of a person’s actual habitation. The construction of this term shall be governed by the following rules:

Residence is the place where a person has a current habitation and to which, whenever he is absent, he has the intention of returning;

A person shall not gain or lose residence merely by reason of his presence or absence while:

Employed in the service of the United States or of this state; or

A student at an institution of learning; or

Kept at a hospital or other institution; or

Stationed at or residing on a military reservation or installation or at a transient camp maintained for relief purposes by the government of the United States in this state. No person shall be excluded as a voter solely because of his residence on a federal enclave within the state. This factor shall be considered with all others in the determination of the person’s residence within the state for voting purposes.

A person shall not lose his residence by leaving his home to go to another state, another district of this state, or to another country for temporary purposes, with the intent of returning, if he has not registered in the other state, district or country;

A person shall not gain residence in a county if he enters it without the intent of making it his current actual residence;

If a person removes to another state with the intent of making it his residence, he loses his residence in Wyoming; except that in a general election year, if his registration is valid in Wyoming when he leaves this state and he is unable to qualify under the laws of his new state of residence to vote at the primary or general election, he shall be deemed to have retained residence in Wyoming for purposes of voting by absentee ballot in the primary or general election;

A person who takes up or continues his abode at a place other than where his family resides, shall be a resident of the place where he actually abides;

Candidates seeking election to the office of United States senator or representative in congress shall not, at the time of knowingly seeking nomination or election as provided by paragraph (liii) of this subsection, claim or currently be claiming any residence or receive the benefits of residency from any other state, excluding the benefits of residency related to or incidental from maintaining a residence at or near the United States capital.

“Square” for purposes of chapter 6 of this code shall include a box or oval used to designate the area for casting a vote;

“Tally sheet” means the document used to tabulate hand counted paper ballots;

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 118, § 2;

“Voting device” means:

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 2.

A device for marking the ballots with ink or another substance; or

Any other method for recording votes on ballots so that the ballot may be tabulated by means of automatic tabulating equipment.

“Write-in vote” is a vote cast for a person whose name does not otherwise appear on the official ballot as a candidate for the office for which his name is written in by the voter;

“Federal office” means the offices of president and vice-president of the United States, United States senator and representative in congress;

“Immediate family” means a spouse, parent, sibling, child or other person living in the individual’s household;

“Election assistance” does not include the posting of campaign signs or the availability of campaign materials;

“Acceptable identification” means:

For purposes of voter registration, one (1) of the identification documents or other proof of identity as specified by rule of the secretary of state as adequate proof of the identity of a voter;

For purposes of in person voter identification immediately before voting at a polling place or absentee polling place, any of the following:

A Wyoming driver’s license as defined by W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xxv);

A tribal identification card issued by the governing body of the Eastern Shoshone tribe of Wyoming, the Northern Arapaho tribe of Wyoming or other federally recognized Indian tribe;

A Wyoming identification card issued under W.S.

31-8-101

;

A valid United States passport;

A United States military card;

A driver’s license or identification card issued by any state or outlying possession of the United States;

Photo identification issued by the University of Wyoming, a Wyoming community college or a Wyoming public school;

A valid Medicare insurance card. This subdivision is repealed effective December 31, 2029;

A valid Medicaid insurance card. This subdivision is repealed effective December 31, 2029.

“Canvass” means the audit function that culminates in the final certification of official election returns;

“Provisional ballot” means a ballot provided to a voter whose right to register or to vote cannot be determined at the polls or verified at the election office, in order to allow the voter to cast a ballot at the polls which shall be counted only if the ballot is determined to be a valid ballot as provided in this Election Code;

“Recount” is the processing of ballots through the tabulation system for an additional time or times, conducted for the specific purpose of counting votes again in any specific race, based upon the criteria of W.S.

22-16-109

or

22-16-111

;

“Retabulation” is the process of running ballots back through the tabulation system for an additional time or times for the express purpose of reconciling the count;

“Tribal clerk” means an official designated by the Eastern Shoshone Tribe and an official designated by the Northern Arapaho Tribe or an official designated by the cooperative tribal governing body of the Wind River Indian Reservation acting pursuant to a cooperative agreement entered into by a county and the respective tribe pursuant to W.S.

16-1-101

, which agreement provides for the official to provide services as a registry agent under the direct supervision and control of the county clerk;

“Print” means to write in letters and reproduce whether on paper or other medium by mechanical, magnetic or electrical process;

“Voter registration system” means the single, uniform, official, interactive, computerized, statewide voter registration system containing the registration information of every legally registered elector in the state;

“Precinct” means an area with established boundaries within a political subdivision used for casting and counting votes;

“Polling place” means the physical location where voters cast their ballots on election day;

“Vote center” means a polling place at which any registered elector in the political subdivision holding the election may vote, regardless of the precinct in which he resides, connected through secure internet connections to provide voting information to and receive voting information from the electronic pollbook maintained by the county clerk and used as an option to traditional polling places at the discretion of the county clerk;

“Overvote” means a vote placed on a ballot question in excess of the allowable votes for that ballot question;

“Undervote” means a vote that could have been made on a ballot question but which was not made on that ballot question;

“Unsuccessful candidate” means a person who did not win the election but whose name was printed on the ballot and who received one (1) or more votes in the primary election.

“Candidate” means any person who knowingly seeks nomination or election to public office by:

Filing an application for nomination by primary election, nomination by political party convention or by petition for nomination;

Write-in, except that this subparagraph shall not apply to a person elected to public office by write-in at a general or special election who did not seek or campaign for election to the office;

Forming a campaign committee; or

Receiving contributions or making expenditures, or giving consent for any individual to receive contributions or make expenditures, in order to secure nomination or election to public office.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-2; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1984, ch. 40, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2000, ch. 66, § 1; 2001, ch. 19, § 1; ch. 116, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2003, ch. 80, § 1; ch. 132, § 1; 2004, ch. 94, § 2; 2005, ch. 110, § 1; 2008, ch. 115, § 2; 2013 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 108, §§ 1, 2, effective March 10, 2014; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2018 ch. 118, §§ 1, 2, effective March 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(ii), substituted “marks” for “records,” and deleted “and includes ballot cards, paper ballots, and ballot labels” at the end of the paragraph; in (a)(xiv), substituted “employing an electronic voting” for “employing a voting,” and inserted “or other system of secret voting” following “paper ballots or ballot cards”; in (xli) inserted “register or to” following “a voter whose right to,” and substituted “cast a ballot at the polls which shall be counted only if the ballot is determined to be a valid ballot as provided in this Election Code” for “vote”; added (a)(xlv); and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a)(xxiii), clarifying the definition of “poll list”; in (a)(xvii), substituted “entry and verification of the name and voter information” for “entry of the name”; in (a)(xxix), substituted “the names, addresses, party affiliations and precinct and district numbers of the registered electors” for “electors,” and substituted “secretary of state or county clerks for distribution as provided in W.S.

22-2-113

” for “county clerks”; and added (a)(xlvi).

The 2008 amendment,

repealed (a)(xxxiv)(A) which defined “voting device.”

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “or” for “circle,” and deleted “arrow or other distinctive area” following “oval” in (a)(xxxi).

The 2014 amendment,

repealed former (a)(iv), which read: ““Ballot label” means the cards, papers, booklet, pages, or other materials that contain the names of offices and candidates and statements of ballot propositions to be voted on and which are used in conjunction with ballot cards”; and in (a)(xiv), deleted “ballot labels.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, §
8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2015 amendments. —

The first
2015 amendment, by ch. 76 §
1, effective July 1, 2015, added (a)(xlvii).

The second
2015 amendment, by ch. 138 §
1, effective Mar. 4, 2015, rewrote (a)(xxii), which formerly read: “`Pollbook' is a book used in a precinct on election day containing oaths of election officials, tally sheets, the poll list, and other information specified by law”; and added (a)(xlvii) through (a)(xlix).

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment,
by ch. 118, § 1,
added (a)(liii).

The second
2018 amendment, by ch. 118, § 2, repealed former (a)(xxxiii),
which read: "Valid write-in candidate" means a candidate who has
qualified
as a write-in candidate by following the procedures and
requirements
of W.S.

22-5-501

.

Laws 2018,
ch. 118, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art.
4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in (a)(xxxix), added the (a)(xxxix)(A) designation, "For purposes of voter registration," at the beginning; added (a)(xxxix)(B); and made related changes.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(xxx)(G).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a)(xliv), added “or an official designated by the cooperative tribal governing body” and “Indian” following “Wind River.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Candidate's failure to be registered. —

Candidate's failure to be registered to vote at the time of filing her application for nomination was inconsequential and a mere irregularity since shortly thereafter she reregistered and met all criteria during the primary election, the general election, and at the time she assumed the municipal office. Rue v. Carter, 919 P.2d 633,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1996).

Municipal candidacy requires dwelling or place of habitation within municipal boundaries. —

One may not be a candidate for municipal office in a city or town without having and maintaining a dwelling or place of habitation physically situated within the municipal boundaries of such city or town. Karn v. Hayes, 530 P.2d 156,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1975).

Thus, where there was no showing that appellant had a place of fixed habitation within the corporate limits of the city to which she had the intention of returning, she had not brought herself within the statutory qualifications to stand for election in that city. Karn v. Hayes, 530 P.2d 156,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1975).

Candidate convicted of felony in another state unqualified to run for county commissioner. —

The district court correctly ruled that a candidate, who had been convicted of a felony in another state and who had not had his rights restored in Wyoming, was unqualified to run for county commissioner. The fact that Wyoming might have treated the candidate's conviction as a misdemeanor had it occurred here, and that the candidate did not lose his civil rights in the state of conviction, did not alter this outcome. However, the court erred in issuing a writ of mandamus directing the holding of a special election, as a judgment annulling the election in which the unqualified candidate's name appeared on the ballot was the appropriate remedy. Mills v. Campbell County Canvassing Bd., 707 P.2d 747,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 588

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

Murphy v. State Canvassing Bd., 12 P.3d 677,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 2000); Woodruff v. Wyoming, — F.3d —,

2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 21060

(10th Cir. Oct. 7, 2002).